Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Salary Supplements

4-24-201. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the commission on firefighting personnel standards and education created by this chapter;

“Firefighter” means any person in the employ of a unit of government who is a member of the fire department of such unit, is trained in firefighting or prevention of fires, and is actively engaged in such work, and whose primary livelihood is derived from such work; and

“Unit of government” means any county, municipality, the state of Tennessee or any political subdivision or agency thereof, employing firefighters, all of whom must meet the minimum employment standards established by the commission.

Acts 1975, ch. 268, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-2410; Acts 1986, ch. 534, § 1; 2004, ch. 427, § 8.

4-24-202. Bonus pay — Eligibility.

Any unit of government with firefighters who successfully complete in each year an in-service training course, appropriate to the firefighter's rank and responsibility and the size and location of the firefighter's department, of at least forty (40) hours duration at a school certified or established by the commission shall be entitled to receive a pay supplement of eight hundred dollars ($800) from the commission to be paid to the firefighter in addition to the firefighter's regular salary.

Any or all firefighters shall be eligible for such educational incentive upon satisfactory completion, as determined by the commission, of forty (40) hours of such training in each year.

Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any firefighter who served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States during either the Desert Storm or Desert Shield Operations shall receive the cash salary supplement provided pursuant to this section, if such service prevented such firefighter from attending the in-service training program pursuant to this section. The provisions are retroactive in application.

In addition, any firefighter who served or serves on active duty in the armed forces of the United States during Operation Enduring Freedom or any other period of armed conflict prescribed by presidential proclamation or federal law that occurs following the period involving Operation Enduring Freedom shall receive the cash salary supplement provided pursuant to this section, if such service prevented or prevents such firefighter from attending the in-service training program pursuant to this section.

Acts 1975, ch. 268, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-2411; Acts 1988, ch. 1003, § 3; 1992, ch. 588, § 3; 2003, ch. 289, § 1; 2004, ch. 427, § 5; 2007, ch. 567, § 1; 2019, ch. 152, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Attorney General Opinions. Eligibility of fire fighters called to active military duty for vacation and sick leave; eligibility of police officers, fire fighters, and sheriff's deputies called to active military duty for supplemental pay, OAG 92-12, 1992 Tenn. AG LEXIS 12 (2/19/92).

4-24-203. Funding.

Funds made available under this part to units of government shall be received and expended as follows:

Funds shall be used only as a cash salary bonus supplement to firefighters;

Each firefighter shall be entitled to receive the educational incentive that such firefighter's qualifications brought to such unit;

Funds provided shall not be used to supplant existing salaries or as substitutes for normal salary increases periodically due to firefighters; and

In accordance with rules and regulations of the commission.

Acts 1975, ch. 268, § 4; T.C.A., § 4-2413; Acts 2004, ch. 427, § 6.

4-24-204. Equal opportunity for training.

All units of government are hereby expressly prohibited from discriminating against any firefighter by interfering with or denying any firefighter the opportunity to participate in any training or educational program established by such unit of government for the purpose of compliance with this part.

Acts 1975, ch. 268, § 5; T.C.A., § 4-2414.

4-24-205. Minimum employment and training standards.

The commission is empowered to establish minimum employment and training standards for firefighters who are to be eligible for educational incentives.

Acts 1975, ch. 268, § 6; T.C.A., § 4-2415; Acts 2004, ch. 427, § 7.